Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-604
Community betterment purposes, defined.

(1) Community betterment purposes shall mean (a) benefiting persons by enhancing their opportunity for educational advancement, by relieving or protecting them from disease, suffering, or distress, by contributing to their physical well-being, by assisting them in establishing themselves in life as worthy and useful citizens, by providing them with opportunities to contribute to the betterment of the community, or by increasing their comprehension of and devotion to the principles upon which this nation was founded, (b) initiating, performing, or fostering worthy public works or enabling or furthering the erection or maintenance of public structures, (c) lessening the burdens borne by government or voluntarily supporting, augmenting, or supplementing services which government would normally render to the people, or (d) providing tax relief for the community.

(2) Community betterment purposes shall not include any activity consisting of an attempt to influence legislation or participate in any political campaign on behalf of any elected official or person who is or has been a candidate for public office.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 175;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 55.